Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska9-205
Bingo occasion, defined.

Bingo occasion shall mean a single gathering or session at which a bingo game or series of successive bingo games are played.

Laws 1978, LB 351, § 5;

Laws 1984, LB 949, § 4;

R.S.Supp.,1984, § 9-128;

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 6.